src-fst-morphology-phonology.twolc.md
TRIGGER
* %^A2E:0 
* %^A2I:0 
* %^A2O:0 
* %^A2Ö:0 
* %^A2U:0 
* %^A2Ü:0 
* %^A2IE:0 
* %^O2E:0 
* %^O2I:0 
* %^O2IE:0 
* %^EI2IE:0 
* %^EI2I:0 
* %^CC2C:0 mm:m0 kommen kommst kamst
* %^DeV:0 g0:ch
* %^LowerVow:0 o:a 
* %^Pen:0 penultimate syllable
* %^RmVow:0 remove vowel
* %^Umlaut:0 umlaut a:ä, o:ö, u:ü

* *Boden%^Umlaut%>#*
* *Böden000*

* ★*Boden%^Umlaut%>#* (is not standard language)
* ★*Boden000* (is not standard language)

* *konn%^LowerVow*
* *kann0*

* *Baum%^Umlaut%>e#*
* *Bäum00e0*

* *Apfel%^Umlaut*
* *Äpfel0*

* *Napf%^Umlaut%>e#*
* *Näpf00e0*

* ★*Napf%^Umlaut%>e#* (is not standard language)
* ★*Napf00e0* (is not standard language)

dreschen+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1
* *drosch%^O2E%>en*
* *dresch0%>en*

geben+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1
* *gab%^A2E%>e*
* *geb0%>e*

geben+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2
* *gab%^A2I%>st*
* *gib0%>st*
halten+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2
* *ha0lt%^A2IE%>e%>st*
* *hielt0%>e%>st*
fallen+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1
* *fa0ll%^A2IE%^CC2C%>en*
* *fiel00%>en*

schwimmen+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2
* *schwamm%^A2I%>st*
* *schwimm0%>st*

fahren+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2
* *fahr%^A2U%>st*
* *fuhr0%>st*

fahren+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2
* *fahr%^A2Ü%>st*
* *führ0%>st*

gelten+V+Subj+Prt+Sg1
* *galt%^A2Ö%>e*
* *gölt0%>e*

stoßen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2
* *sto0ß%^O2IE%>e%>st*
* *stieß0%>e%>st*
dreschen+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3
* *drosch%^O2I%>t*
* *drisch0%>t*

* *Saal%^Umlaut%>e#*
* *Sä0l00e0*

Salto
* *Salto%^RmVow*
* *Salt00*

reißen
* *reiss%^CC2C%>en*
* *rei0ß0%>en*

treffen+V+Subj+Prt+Pl1
* *traff%^Umlaut%^CC2C%>en*
* *trä0f00%>en*

aasen+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2
* *aas%>st*
* *aas%>0t*
groß+A+Superl+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def
* *groß%^Umlaut%>st%>e*
* *größ0%>0t%>e*

reißen
* *reiss%^CC2C%>en*
* *rei0ß0%>en*

fallen+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1
* *fa0ll%^A2IE%^CC2C%>en*
* *fie0l0%>en*

schrecken+V+Subj+Prt+Pl1
* *schrack%^Umlaut%^CC2C%>en*
* *schrä0k00%>en*

* *Nomade%>en#*
* *Nomad00en0*

* ★*Nomade%>en#* (is not standard language)
* ★*Nomade0en0* (is not standard language)
ackern+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1
* *acker%^Pen%^RmVow%>e*
* *ack0r00%>e*
bleiben+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1
* *blei0b%^EI2IE*
* *bl0ieb0*
reißen
* *reiss%^EI2I*
* *r0iss0*

mögen+V+Mod+Ind+Prt+Sg1
* *mog0%^DeV%>te*
* *moch0%>te*

mögen+V+Mod+Ind+Prt+Sg1
* *mog0%^DeV%>te*
* *moch0%>te*

stoßen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2
* *sto0ß%^O2IE%>e%>st*
* *stieß0%>e%>st*
halten+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2
* *ha0lt%^A2IE%>e%>st*
* *hielt0%>e%>st*
bleiben+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1
* *blei0b%^EI2IE*
* *bl0ieb0*

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-deu/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc)</small>

---
